Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3938.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 65A.27, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Scope. For purposes of sections 65A.27 to new text begin 65A.304new text end , the following terms have the meanings given. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective October 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [65A.304] FIREARM LIABILITY INSURANCE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Damage" means an injury to a person, the death of a person, or damage to property. new text end new text begin (c) "Firearm" has the meaning given in section 609.666, subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Insurers. new text end new text begin An insurer writing homeowner's insurance in Minnesota must make available at least one form or rider that provides the coverage required under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Insurance compulsory. new text end new text begin (a) A Minnesota resident who owns a firearm must maintain liability insurance, as a part of a homeowner's insurance policy or otherwise, that covers loss or damage of at least $100,000 arising from any one incident to a person, other than the insured, who is injured as a result of an accidental or unintentional discharge of the firearm. new text end new text begin (b) For purposes of this section, a person remains the owner of a lost or stolen firearm until the loss or theft is reported to law enforcement. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Evidence of compliance. new text end new text begin A firearm owner that provides an insurance policy declaration page documenting coverage is evidence of a policy that complies with the requirements of this section. A failure to provide proof of coverage through a declaration page, or a digital policy that contains the insured's name, policy coverage, and dates of coverage, is prima facie evidence that the firearm owner has violated this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Penalties. new text end new text begin (a) A person who violates this section for the first time may be charged with a petty misdemeanor and fined up to $300. The fine under this paragraph may be suspended or partially waived if the firearm owner demonstrates proof of insurance within 30 days. new text end new text begin (b) A second or subsequent conviction of this section within five years of a prior conviction is a misdemeanor and the court may impose a fine of up to $1,000. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Exemptions. new text end new text begin (a) This section does not apply to a federal firearm licensee or a person the court excuses from complying with this section as provided in this subdivision. new text end new text begin (b) A person may obtain an order to be excused from the requirements of this section by filing with the district court in the county in which the person resides a petition seeking an order declaring the person to be excused. The petition must demonstrate that: new text end new text begin (1) the petitioner was denied insurance coverage by two or more insurers that normally would offer liability insurance covering the accidental or unintentional discharge of a firearm; or new text end new text begin (2) the petitioner would qualify for a court-appointed attorney in a criminal matter and has been offered the coverage required but lacks adequate financial resources to pay for the insurance. new text end new text begin (c) The court must hold a hearing and consider all relevant evidence, including grants or other funding sources available to the petitioner to obtain the required insurance coverage. The court may issue an order that the person is exempt from the insurance requirements under this section if the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that: new text end new text begin (1) an exemption in paragraph (b), clause (1) or (2), applies to the petitioner; new text end new text begin (2) the petitioner is likely to behave in a prudent and safe manner with respect to storing, carrying, and using the firearm; and new text end new text begin (3) the petitioner (i) has a gun safe or other secure container to store the firearm, and (ii) demonstrates to the court the location in the home where the gun safe or secure container is permanently affixed. new text end new text begin (d) An exemption order under this subdivision is valid for two years. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective October 1, 2026, and applies to all owners of firearms on or after that date. new text end